praksid/praks1/kriuchkova-kodutöö1/kriuchkova.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

+S ! Nimisõna
+A ! Omadussõna
+V ! Tegusõna
+P ! Asesõna
+N ! Arvsõna
+Adv ! Määrsõna
+I ! Hüüdsõna
+C ! Sidesõna
+Adp ! Kaasõna
 
+Sg
+Pl

+Nom ! Nimetav
+Gen ! Omastav
+Part ! Osastav
+Ill ! Sisseütlev
+Ine ! Seesütlev
+Ela ! Seestütlev
+All ! Alaleütlev
+Ade ! Alalütlev
+Abl ! Alaltütlev
+Trl ! Saav
+Ter ! Rajav
+Ess ! Olev
+Abe ! Ilmaütlev
+Com ! Kaasaütlev

LEXICON Root

Sofia+S:Sofia tüüp_sofia ;
Hiir+S:Hiir tüüp_hiir ;
Tartu+S:Tartu tüüp_sofia ;
Suur+A:Suur tüüp_hiir ;

LEXICON tüüp_sofia
	+Sg: sofia_sg ;
	+Pl: sofia_pl ;

LEXICON tüüp_hiir
	+Sg: hiir_sg ;
	+Pl: hiir_pl ;

LEXICON sofia_sg
	+Nom: # ;
	+Gen: # ;
	+Part:t # ;
	+Ill:sse # ;
	+Ine:s # ;
	+Ela:st # ;
	+All:le # ;
	+Ade:l # ;
	+Abl:lt # ;
	+Trl:ks # ;
	+Ter:ni # ;
	+Ess:na # ;
	+Abe:ta # ;
	+Com:ga # ;

LEXICON sofia_pl
	+Nom:d # ;
	+Gen:te # ;
	+Part:id # ;
	+Ill:tesse # ;
	+Ine:tes # ;
	+Ela:test # ;
	+All:tele # ;
	+Ade:tel # ;
	+Abl:telt # ;
	+Trl:teks # ;
	+Ter:teni # ;
	+Ess:tena # ;
	+Abe:teta # ;
	+Com:tega # ;

LEXICON hiir_sg
	+Nom: # ;
	+Gen:e # ;
	+Part:t # ;
	+Ill:esse # ;
	+Ine:es # ;
	+Ela:est # ;
	+All:ele # ;
	+Ade:el # ;
	+Abl:elt # ;
	+Trl:eks # ;
	+Ter:eni # ;
	+Ess:ena # ;
	+Abe:eta # ;
	+Com:ega # ;

LEXICON hiir_pl
	+Nom:ed # ;
	+Gen:te # ;
	+Part:i # ;
	+Ill:tesse # ;
	+Ine:tes # ;
	+Ela:test # ;
	+All:tele # ;
	+Ade:tel # ;
	+Abl:telt # ;
	+Trl:teks # ;
	+Ter:teni # ;
	+Ess:tena # ;
	+Abe:teta # ;
	+Com:tega # ;
